src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
- LEXICON Ns 
- +Subst+Noun+Sg:0 NounSéUrú; 

- LEXICON Nspl 
- +Subst+Noun+Pl:0 NounSéUrú; 

## INITIAL MUTATIONS
### NOMINATIVE SINGULAR 
- LEXICON Nom-sg-initial 
- NounSéUrú; 
definite article eg. an cat (m) (p38 NIG)
an t-éan(m) - the bird (p39 NIG) 
an bhróg(f) - the shoe
initial mutation for other reasons
e.g. comp. preps. ar an gcnoc, poss. mo chat

^IM = initial mutation e.g. with prepositions, and possession
Singular:
e.g. ar an bhosca, ar an mbosca
possessive markers on vowels: ár n-athair, a (f) hathair, 
Plural:
e.g. ar bhoscaí, i mboscaí
possessive e.g. ár n-aithreacha - our fathers (^C)

- LEXICON NounSéUrú 
- Emphasis; 
- +Ecl:^IM^Urú Emphasis; 
adds ^h to vowel-initial words ...  but adds the +hPref to all words ... see fix file

- LEXICON Emphasis 
- #; 
- +Emph:s^Emph #;   NEEDS 1PL NE/NA & 3PL SEAN/SAN ALSO

### GENITIVE SINGULAR 

- LEXICON Gen-sg-initial 
### VOCATIVE SINGULAR 
Since this is trivial (always ^Sé) it is included with Final Mutations
in Voc-sg-0 and Voc-sg-1.

### ALL PLURALS
Note: Vocative Plural does not require Def & Idf but it is easier to generate 
them and remove all Voc Pl Idfs at the end (the Def form is correct 
although the Def marker is unnecessary)

- LEXICON Pl-initial 

## FINAL MUTATIONS
### NOMINATIVE SINGULAR
- LEXICON Nom-sg 
- +Sg:0 Nom-sg-initial; 

### GENITIVE SINGULAR 

- LEXICON Gen-sg-D1  1st. Declension - Caolú (Slenderise)
- +Sg:^Caol Gen-sg-initial; 

- LEXICON Gen-sg-D2  2nd. Declension - Caolú (Slenderise) and

- LEXICON Gen-sg-D2a  2nd. Declension - each -> í, ach -> aí 

- LEXICON Gen-sg-D3  3rd. Declension -  Broaden (Leathnú) and

- LEXICON Gen-sg-D4  4th. Declension - No change

- LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-1  5th. Declension - (Broaden) + ach
- LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-2  5th. Declension - Sync + (e)ach
- LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-2a  5th. Declension - Sync + a
- LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-2b  5th. Declension - Sync + Slen + e
- LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-3  5th. Declension - Add "n"
- LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-4  5th. Declension - Add "d"
- LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-5  5th. Declension -  Broaden (Leathnú)
- LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-6  5th. Declension -  Change + ithe
- LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-7  5th. Declension -  Change + Slen + the
- LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-8  5th. Declension -  Change + Slen + te

### VOCATIVE SINGULAR 

- LEXICON Voc-sg-0 
- +Sg+Len:^Sé #;  eg. a rún, a phobal

- LEXICON Voc-sg-1 

### ALL PLURALS

- LEXICON PL-TADA  NO CHANGE (LIT. NOTHING)

- LEXICON PL-CAOLÚ  CAOLÚ (SLENDERISE)

- LEXICON PL-LEATHNÚ  LEATHNÚ (BROADEN)

- LEXICON PL-(LEA)A  ADD "A" & LEATHNÚ (BROADEN) IF SLENDER

- LEXICON PL-TA  ADD "TA"

- LEXICON PL-(LEA)THA  ADD "THA" & LEATHNÚ IF SLENDER

- LEXICON PL-(E)ANNA  ADD "ANNA" IF BROAD & ADD "EANNA" IF SLENDER

- LEXICON PL-Í  ADD "Í"

- LEXICON PL-TÍ  ADD "TÍ"

- LEXICON PL-(CAOL)E  ADD "E" & CAOLÚ IF BROAD

- LEXICON PL-(CAOL)EACHA  ADD "EACHA" & CAOLÚ

- LEXICON PL-(LEA)ACHA  ADD "ACHA" & LEATHNÚ

- LEXICON PL-(E)ACHA  ADD "ACHA" IF BROAD & ADD "EACHA" IF SLENDER

- LEXICON PL-THANNA  ADD "THANNA"

- LEXICON PL-TE  ADD "TE"

- LEXICON PL-AÍ  ADD "AÍ"

- LEXICON PL-NNA  ADD "NNA"

- LEXICON PL-THE  ADD "THE"

- LEXICON PL-NA  ADD "NA"

- LEXICON PL-IDÍ  ADD "IDÍ"

- LEXICON PL-ATHRÚ  ATHRÚ (CHANGE LAST SYLLABLE)

- LEXICON PL-(E)ANTA  ADD "ANTA" IF BROAD & ADD "EANTA" IF SLENDER

- LEXICON PL-ITE  ADD "ITE"

- LEXICON PL-ONNA  ADD "ONNA"

- LEXICON PL-OCHA  ADD "OCHA"

E. Uí Dhonnchadha 
ADDED THE +SG TAG 20/2/2004
ADDED NP-Fam Aug 2004

- LEXICON NP-PLACE 

- LEXICON NP-PLACE-EN 

- LEXICON NP-PLACE-sg 

- LEXICON NP-PLACE-fem 

- LEXICON NP-PLACE-pl 

- LEXICON NP-FAM-EN 

- LEXICON NP-PERS-EN-fem 

- LEXICON NP-PERS-EN 

- LEXICON NP-Fam 

- LEXICON NP-Fam-0 

- LEXICON NP-Fam-V 

- LEXICON NP-Fam-chg 

when it is a place name
as well as the usual inflections for propernouns  (4 classes)
we want to generate an adjectival form e.g. Beilg - Beilgeach

new 5-6-2024
Place and Personal name files both use Nf1-Prop and Nm1-Prop etc.

- LEXICON Nf2-Prop-Place 

- LEXICON Nf3-Prop-Place 

- LEXICON Nf4-Prop-Place 

- LEXICON Nf5-Prop-Place 

- LEXICON Nm1-Prop-Place 

- LEXICON Nm4-Prop-Place 

- LEXICON Nm1-Prop-PName 

- LEXICON Nm3-Prop-PName 

- LEXICON Nm4-Prop-PName 

- LEXICON Nf2-Prop-PName 

- LEXICON Nf3-Prop-PName 

- LEXICON Nf4-Prop-PName 

masc nouns - slenderise
- LEXICON Nm1-Prop 

fem nouns - slenderise and add e
- LEXICON Nf2-Prop 

fem nouns - broaden and add a
- LEXICON Nf3-Prop 

fem nouns - no change

masc nouns - no change

fem nouns - Albain/na hAlban

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
